California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(1) The contract shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or, in the authority’s discretion, to the person who submitted a proposal that provides the best value to the commission on the basis of the
 factors identified in the solicitation when the purchase price of all supplies, equipment, and materials exceeds one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000). “Best value” means the overall combination of quality, price, and other elements of a proposal that, when considered together, provide the greatest overall benefit in response to requirements described in the solicitation documents. The contract shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder when the purchase price of the construction of all facilities exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(2) The authority shall obtain a minimum of three quotations, either written or oral, that permit prices and terms to be compared whenever the expected expenditure required exceeds three thousand dollars ($3,000), but not one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000).

(3) The authority may purchase supplies, equipment, and
 materials from a public auction sale, including public auctions held via the internet, using the procedures established for all other participants in the public auction.

(4) The authority may participate in a procurement agreement involving other public entities that is identified by a procuring public entity or entities as a cooperative procuring agreement from which other public entities may make purchases or enter into contracts, and the authority may procure, and enter into contracts for, items purchased pursuant to that procurement agreement, notwithstanding that the authority may not be the procuring public entity, provided the procurement agreement is awarded or entered into by either of the following:

(A) One or more public entities or an organization of public
 entities, which may include the authority.

(B) A federal, state, or local public entity.

(5) (A) Notwithstanding any other law requiring the authority to award contracts to the lowest responsible bidder, the authority may, except as to contracts for professional services involving private architectural, landscape architectural, engineering, environmental, land surveying, or construction project management as defined in Sections 4525 and 4529.10 of the Government Code, do any of the following in facilitating contract awards with small business enterprises, medium business enterprises, local small business enterprises, and disabled veteran business enterprises:

(i) Provide for a small business enterprise
 preference in construction, the construction component of a design-build team, the procurement of goods, or the delivery of services. The preference to a small business enterprise shall be 5 percent of the lowest responsible bidder meeting specifications that provides for small business enterprise participation.

(ii) Provide for a local small business enterprise preference in construction, the construction component of a design-build team, the procurement of goods, or the delivery of services. The preference to a local small business enterprise shall be 5 percent of the lowest responsible bidder meeting specifications that provides for local small business enterprise participation. The authority may also offer the preference to a nonlocal business if the bid includes a 30-percent participation by local small business enterprises.

(iii) Establish a subcontracting participation goal for small business enterprises on contracts financed with nonfederal funds and grant a preference of 5 percent to the lowest responsible bidders who meet the goal.

(iv) Require bidders, before the time bids are opened, to comply with the small business enterprise and disabled veteran business enterprise goals and requirements established by the authority on contracts financed with nonfederal funds.

(v) In awarding contracts to the lowest responsible bidder, award the contract to the lowest responsible bidder meeting the small business enterprise and disabled veteran business enterprise goals.

(vi) Until January
 1, 2028, set aside work for competition among certified small business enterprises and award each contract to the lowest responsible bidder whenever the expected expenditure required exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000) but is less than five million dollars ($5,000,000), as long as price quotations are solicited by the authority from three or more certified small business enterprises.

(vii) Until January 1, 2028, set aside work for competition among medium business enterprises for no more than 20 contracts and award each contract to the lowest responsible bidder whenever the expected expenditure required exceeds five million dollars ($5,000,000) but is less than thirty million dollars ($30,000,000), as long as price quotations are solicited by the authority from three or more medium business enterprises.

(B) If the authority awards contracts pursuant to clause (vi) or (vii) of subparagraph (A), the authority, for purposes of legislative oversight, shall prepare and submit the reports described in this subparagraph to the Legislature regarding contracts awarded pursuant to clauses (vi) and (vii) of subparagraph (A). The reports shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code and shall be submitted in accordance with the following:

(i) By December 31, 2023, for contracts issued between January 1, 2019, and December 31, 2023.

(ii) By December 31, 2026, for contracts issued between January 1, 2019, and December 31, 2026. The report shall note the number of employees working at a medium business
 enterprise receiving awards pursuant to this section.

(C) A small or medium business enterprise recommended for a contract award through use of a set aside shall be performing a commercially useful function. A small business enterprise shall be presumed to be performing a commercially useful function if it performs and exercises responsibility of at least 30 percent of the total cost of the contract work with its own workforce.

(D) “Small business enterprise” as used in this paragraph, means a business enterprise that is classified as a small business under United States Small Business Administration rules and meets the current small business enterprise size standards found in Part 121 of Title 13 of the Code of Federal Regulations appropriate to the type of work the enterprise
 seeks to perform. The authority may establish limitations regarding the average annual gross receipts of a small business over the previous three fiscal years and establish limitations regarding the personal net worth of the owner of the small business, exclusive of the value of the owner’s personal residence.

(E) “Local small business enterprise” as used in this paragraph, means a business enterprise that is classified as a small business under United States Small Business Administration rules, meets the current small business enterprise size standards found in Part 121 of Title 13 of the Code of Federal Regulations appropriate to the type of work the enterprise seeks to perform, and is headquartered in the County of Los Angeles.

(F) “Medium business enterprise” as used in this
 paragraph means a company that is not a subsidiary of another company and that has a maximum of 250 employees and a maximum of two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) in gross annual receipts averaged over three years.

(G) “Disabled veteran business enterprise” as used in this paragraph has the meaning as defined in Section 999 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(H) “Goal” as used in this paragraph means a numerically expressed objective that bidders are required to achieve.

(g) The following provisions apply only to the San Bernardino County Transportation Authority:

(1) The purchase of all supplies, equipment, and materials, when the
 expenditure required exceeds one hundred
 thousand dollars ($100,000), shall, by contract, be let to the lowest responsible bidder, or, in the authority’s discretion, to the responsible bidder who submitted a proposal that provides the best value to the authority on the basis of the factors identified in the solicitation. “Best value” means the overall combination of quality, price, and other elements of a proposal that, when
 considered together, provide the greatest overall benefit in response to the requirements described in the solicitation documents.

(2) To the extent practicable, the authority shall obtain a minimum of three quotations, either written or oral, that permit prices and terms to be compared whenever the expected expenditure required for the purchase of supplies, equipment, or materials exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000), but does not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 724, Sec. 1.   (AB 2590)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

130233.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), if, after rejecting bids received under Section 130232, the commission determines and declares, by a two-thirds vote of all of its members, that the supplies, equipment, or materials may be purchased at a lower price in the open market, the commission may proceed to purchase those supplies, equipment, or materials in the open market without further observance of the provisions in this article regarding contracts, bids, advertisement, or notice.

(b) If, after rejecting bids received under Section 130232, the San Bernardino County Transportation Authority determines and declares, by a majority vote
 of all of its members, that the supplies, equipment, or materials may be purchased at a lower price in the open market, the authority may proceed to purchase those supplies, equipment, or materials in the open market without further observance of the provisions in this article regarding contracts, bids, advertisement, or notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 216, Sec. 6.   (SB 1305)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

130234.

In case of any great public calamity, such as an extraordinary fire, flood, storm, epidemic, or other disaster, or interruption of contracts essential to the provision of daily transit service or catastrophic failure of revenue-producing equipment or facilities, the commission may, by resolution passed by a two-thirds vote of all its members, declare and determine that public interest and necessity demand the immediate expenditure of public money to safeguard life, health, or property, and thereupon proceed to expend or enter into a contract involving the expenditure of any sum needed in the emergency without observance of the provisions in this article regarding contracts, bids, advertisement, or notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 137.4.)
-------------------------------------------

130235.

(a) Upon determining that immediate remedial measures to avert or alleviate damage to property, or to replace, repair, or restore damaged or destroyed property, of the commission are necessary in order to ensure that the facilities of the commission are available to serve the transportation needs of the general public, and upon determining that available remedial measures, including procurement or construction in compliance with Sections 130232, 130233, and 130234 are inadequate, the executive director may authorize the expenditure of money previously appropriated specifically by the commission for the direct purchases of goods and services, without following those sections.

(b) The executive director shall, after any such expenditure, submit to the commission a full report explaining the necessity for the action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 137.5.)
-------------------------------------------

130236.

Notwithstanding Section 130232, and upon a finding by two-thirds vote of all members of the commission that the proposed purchase in compliance with Sections 130232 and 130233 does not constitute a method of procurement adequate for the operation of commission facilities or equipment, the commission may direct the procurement of prototype equipment or modifications in an amount sufficient to conduct and evaluate operational testing without further observance of any provisions in this article regarding contracts, bids, advertisements, or notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 137.6.)
-------------------------------------------

130237.

Notwithstanding Section 130232, the commission may direct the purchase of any supply, equipment, or material without observance of any provision in this article regarding contracts, bids, advertisement, or notice upon a finding by two-thirds of all members of the commission that there is only a single source of procurement therefor and that the purchase is for the sole purpose of duplicating or replacing supply, equipment, or material already in use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 137.7.)
-------------------------------------------

130238.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that (1) because of the highly specialized and unique nature of all rail transit equipment, (2) because of products and materials which are undergoing rapid technological changes, and (3) for the introduction of new technological changes into the operations of the commission, it may be in the public interest to consider, in addition to price, factors such as vendor financing, performance reliability, standardization, life-cycle costs, delivery timetables, support logistics, and the broadest possible range of competing products and materials available, fitness of purchase, manufacturer’s warranty, and similar factors in the award of contracts for these vehicles and equipment.

(b) This section applies only to the purchase by the commission of (1) specialized rail transit equipment, including rail cars, and (2) computers, telecommunications equipment, fare collections equipment, microwave equipment, and other related electronic equipment and apparatus. This section does not apply to contracts for construction or for the procurement of any product available in substantial quantities to the general public.

(c) The commission may, after finding by a two-thirds vote of all of its members that a particular procurement qualifies under subdivision (b), direct that the procurement be conducted through competitive negotiation under this section. For purposes of this section, competitive negotiation includes, but is not limited to, all of the following requirements:

(1) The request for proposals shall be prepared and submitted to an adequate number of qualified sources, as determined by the commission, to permit reasonable competition consistent with the nature and requirement of the procurement.

(2) Notice of the request for proposals shall be published at least twice in a newspaper of general circulation, at least 10 days before the date for receipt of the proposals.

(3) The commission shall make every effort to generate the maximum feasible number of proposals from qualified sources and shall make a finding to that effect before proceeding to negotiate if only a single response to the request for proposals is received.

(4) The request for proposals shall identify all significant evaluation factors, including price, and their relative importance.

(5) The commission shall provide reasonable procedures for technical evaluation of the proposals received, identification of qualified sources, and selection for contract award.

(6) Award shall be made to the qualified proposer whose proposal will be most advantageous to the commission with price and all other factors considered.

(7) If award is not made to the bidder whose proposal contains the lowest price, the commission shall make a finding setting forth the basis for the award.

(d) The commission, at its discretion, may reject any and all proposals and request new proposals.

(e) A person who submits, or who plans to submit, a proposal may protest any acquisition conducted in accordance with this section as follows:

(1) Protests based on the content of the request for proposals shall be filed with the commission within 10 calendar days after the request for proposals is first advertised in accordance with subdivision (c). The commission shall issue a written decision on the protest prior to opening of proposals. A protest may be renewed by refiling the protest with the commission within 15 calendar days after the mailing of the notice of the recommended award.

(2) Any bidder may protest the recommended award on any ground not based upon the content of the request for proposals by filing a protest with the commission within 15 calendar days after the mailing of the notice of the recommended award.

(3) Any protest shall contain a full and complete written statement specifying in detail the grounds of the protest and the facts supporting the protest. Protestors shall have an opportunity to appear and be heard before the commission prior to the opening of proposals in the case of protests based on the content of the request for proposals, or prior to final award in the case of protests based on other grounds or the renewal of protests based on the content of the request for proposals.

(f) Provisions in any contract concerning women and minority business enterprises, which provisions are in accordance with the request for proposals, shall not be subject to negotiation with the successful bidder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 591, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

130239.

In order to facilitate the participation of minority-owned and women-owned businesses and disadvantaged individuals in activities and contracts of the commission, to the extent that the provisions of Executive Order 11246 of September 24, 1965, as amended, and Chapter 60 (commencing with Section 60.1) of Title 41 and Part 23 (commencing with Section 23.1) of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations are not applicable, the commission has the authority to develop a program to implement similar provisions applicable to its activities and contracts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 159, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

130240.

(a) “Transit” means as defined in Section 40005.

(b) (1) The Orange County Transportation Authority may acquire, construct, develop, lease, jointly develop, own, operate, maintain, control, use, jointly use, or dispose of rights-of-way, rail lines, monorails, guideways, buslines, stations, platforms, switches, yards, terminals, parking lots, air rights, land rights, development rights, entrances and exits, and any and all other facilities for, incidental to, necessary for, or convenient for transit service, including, but not limited to, facilities and structures physically or functionally related to transit service, within or partly without the county, underground, upon, or above the ground and under, upon or over public streets, highways, bridges, or other public ways or waterways, together with all physical structures necessary for, incidental to, or convenient for the access of persons and vehicles thereto, and may acquire, lease, sell, or otherwise contract with respect to any interest in or rights to the use or joint use of any or all of the foregoing. However, installations on state freeways are subject to the approval of the Department of Transportation and installations in other state highways are subject to Article 2 (commencing with Section 670) of Chapter 3 of Division 1 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(2) With respect to the segment of State Highway Route 91 between State Highway Route 15 and State Highway Route 55 only, the Orange County Transportation Authority may exercise all of the powers contained in paragraph (1) that apply to streets, highways, bridges, and connector roads.

(3) The exercise of the powers provided to the Orange County Transportation Authority in paragraph (2) is subject to approval by the Board of Supervisors of Riverside County and the Riverside County Transportation Commission and in consultation with the advisory committee described in Section 130245 as it relates to the use of those powers in Riverside County under the terms of the franchise agreement described in subdivision (c).

(c) If the Orange County Transportation Authority requests, the department shall approve the assignment to the Orange County Transportation Authority of the Amended and Restated Development Franchise Agreement, as amended, between the department and the California Private Transportation Company, L.P. (CPTC) for the State Highway Route 91 median improvements as authorized by Section 143 of the Streets and Highways Code, subject to the requirement that subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive, of Section 2 of Article 3 of the restated franchise agreement be deleted in their entirety in the event that CPTC and the authority agree to the assignment of all of CPTC’s interests in the franchise agreement to the authority.

(d) The Orange County Transportation Authority shall have the authority to impose tolls for use of the State Highway Route 91 facilities as authorized by the franchise agreement.

(e) (1) Toll revenues from the use of State Highway Route 91 facilities between State Highway Route 55 and the Orange and Riverside County line shall only be used by the Orange County Transportation Authority for the following expenditures relative to the State Highway Route 91 express lanes and for the purposes of paragraph (2):

(A) Capital, operations, and maintenance, including, but not limited to, toll collection and enforcement.

(B) Repair and rehabilitation.

(C) Payment of purchase costs, debt service, and satisfaction of other covenants and obligations related to indebtedness.

(D) Reserves.

(E) Administration, which shall not exceed 3 percent of toll revenues and associated facility revenues.

(2) Excess toll revenues beyond the expenditure needs of paragraph (1) may be expended for the following purposes:

(A) To enhance transit service designed to reduce traffic congestion on State Highway Route 91 or to expand travel options along the State Highway Route 91 corridor. Revenues expended under this subparagraph may be used to maintain the enhanced transit service. Eligible expenditures include, but are not limited to, transit operating assistance, the acquisition of transit vehicles, improvements to commuter rail traveling between Riverside and Orange Counties, and those transit capital improvements otherwise eligible to be funded under the State Transportation Improvement Program pursuant to Section 164 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(B) To make operational or capacity improvements designed to reduce congestion or improve the flow of traffic on State Highway Route 91. Eligible expenditures may include any phase of project delivery to make capital improvements to onramps, connector roads, roadways, bridges, or other structures that are related to the tolled and nontolled facilities on State Highway Route 91 between State Highway Route 57 to the west and the Orange and Riverside county line to the east.

(3) The Orange County Transportation Authority, in consultation with the department and the Riverside County Transportation Commission, shall issue a plan and a proposed completion schedule for transportation improvements in the State Highway Route 91 corridor. The Orange County Transportation Authority shall update the plan on an annual basis.

(f) The Orange County Transportation Authority may incur indebtedness and obligations, and may issue bonds, refund bonds, and assume existing bonds for purposes authorized by this section. Indebtedness and bonds issued under this section do not constitute a debt or liability of the state or any other public agency, other than the authority, or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state or any other public agency, other than the authority. Bonds issued under this section shall not be deemed to constitute a debt or liability of the state or any political subdivision thereof, other than the bank and the authority, or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state or of any political subdivision, but shall be payable solely from the revenues and assets pledged to the repayment of the bonds. All bonds issued under this section shall contain on the face of the bond a statement to the same effect.

(g) Notwithstanding Section 143 of the Streets and Highways Code, the State Highway Route 91 facility constructed and operated under the authority of a franchise agreement approved pursuant to that section shall revert to the state at the expiration of the lease or termination of the franchise agreement at no cost to the state. Upon reversion, the facility shall be delivered to the department in a condition that meets the performance and maintenance standards established by the department.

(h) The Orange County Transportation Authority shall not impose tolls for the use of nor construct and operate State Highway Route 91 facilities in the County of Riverside without prior approval by the Board of Supervisors of the County of Riverside, the Riverside County Transportation Commission, and the advisory committee.

(i) The Orange County Transportation Authority shall not sell or assign its interest in the franchise agreement without approval by the Legislature by enactment of a statute provided that approval shall not be required in connection with granting rights and remedies to lenders under Article 16 of the restated franchise agreement.

(j) If the Orange County Transportation Authority decides to sell or assign its interest in the franchise agreement, the Orange County Transportation Authority shall provide written notice at least 90 days in advance of the date they submit their request for approval by the department pursuant to this subdivision. The written notice shall be provided to the advisory committee created pursuant to Section 130245 and to the Riverside County Transportation Commission.

(k) The Orange County Transportation Authority shall be authorized to eliminate its rights, interests, and obligations relative to State Highway Route 91 in Riverside County, either by partial assignment to the Riverside County Transportation Commission, or by amendment to the restated franchise agreement, as amended. In the event of a partial assignment or amendment, the department shall consent and the term of the restated franchise agreement, as amended by the partial assignment or amendment, shall be extended to a date determined by the authority, which date shall be no later than December 31, 2065.

(l) If the Riverside County Transportation Commission constructs and operates toll facilities on State Highway Route 91 between the Orange County border and State Highway Route 15, then it is the intent of the Legislature that the Riverside County Transportation Commission and the Orange County Transportation Authority enter into an agreement providing for the coordination of the respective toll facilities operated by each entity on State Highway Route 91.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 714, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

130240.1.

(a) The Orange County Transportation Authority may enter into agreements for the joint use or joint development of any property or rights by the authority and any city, public agency, or public utility operating transit facilities or nontransit facilities, or both, or any other person, firm, corporation, association, organization, or other entity, public or private, either, in whole or in part, within or outside the county, for the joint use or development of any property of the authority or of the city, public agency, public utility, person, firm, corporation, association, organization, or other entity, public or private, for the establishment of through routes, joint fares, station cost-sharing, connector fees, or land, air, or development rights, sales or leasing, transfer of passengers, pooling arrangements, or for any other purpose necessary for, incidental to, or convenient for the full exercise of the powers granted in this chapter. As to any service which the authority is authorized to perform pursuant to this chapter, the authority may contract for the performance of the service by any city, county, or public utility the territory of which is, in whole or in part, within the county. 

(b) “Joint development” includes, but is not limited to, agreements with any person, firm, corporation, association, organization, or other entity, public or private, to develop or to engage in the planning, financing, construction, or operation of authority facilities or development projects adjacent, or physically or functionally related, to authority facilities. 

(c) “Nontransit facilities,” as used in this section, includes any land, buildings, or equipment, or interest therein, which is used primarily for the production of transit revenue not arising from the operation of a transit system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 752, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

130240.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Orange County Transportation Authority may acquire rights-of-way from willing sellers for the following projects:

(a) Addition of auxiliary westbound lane to State Route 91, from Interstate 5 to State Route 57, in Orange County.

(b) State Route 57 northbound widening, from Katella Avenue to Lincoln Avenue, in Orange County.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 6, Sec. 5.   Effective May 21, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

130241.

All the provisions of the Orange County Transit District Act of 1965 (Part 4 (commencing with Section 40000) of Division 10), regarding the powers and functions of the Orange County Transit District shall be equally applicable to the Orange County Transportation Authority as if set forth herein, and shall be in addition to the powers and functions set forth in this division. The authority shall determine which provisions are applicable to the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 752, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

130242.

(a) In addition to the other powers it possesses, the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority may enter into contracts with private entities, the scope of which may combine within a single contract all or some of the planning, design, permitting, development, joint development, construction, construction management, acquisition, leasing, installation, and warranty of all or components of (1) transit systems, including, without limitation, passenger loading or intermodal station facilities, and (2) facilities on real property owned or to be owned by the authority. The authority may solicit or award contracts pursuant to this subdivision after a majority vote of the
 members of the authority.

(b) A contract awarded pursuant to this section may include operation and maintenance elements, if the inclusion of those elements (1) is necessary, in the reasonable judgment of the authority, to assess vendor representations and warranties, performance guarantees, or life-cycle efficiencies, and (2) does not conflict with collective bargaining agreements to which the authority is a party. The authority may award contracts pursuant to this subdivision after a finding, by a two-thirds vote of the members of the authority, that awarding the contract will achieve for the authority a more competitive solicitation
 process with respect to quality, timeliness, price, and other private sector efficiencies, relevant to the integration of design, project work, and components.

(c) Any construction, alteration, demolition, repairs, or other works of improvement performed under a contract awarded pursuant to this section shall be considered a public works project subject to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code, and shall be enforced by the Department of Industrial Relations in the same way it carries out this responsibility under the Labor Code.

(d) A contract under this section shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder whose bid is responsive to the criteria set forth in the invitation for bids, or, at the authority’s discretion, to a contractor chosen by a competitive bidding process that employs objective selection criteria that may include, but are not limited to, the proposed design approach, features, functions, life-cycle costs, and other criteria deemed appropriate by the authority, in addition to price. Notice requesting bids or proposals shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation. For contracts estimated to exceed ten million dollars ($10,000,000), publication shall be made at least 60 days before the receipt of the bids or price proposals. For contracts estimated not to exceed ten million dollars ($10,000,000), publication shall be made at least 30 days before the receipt of the bids or price
 proposals. The authority, at its discretion, may reject any and all bids and proposals, and may readvertise. All bids and price proposals submitted pursuant to this section shall be presented under sealed
 cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder security: (1) cash, (2) a cashier’s check made payable to the authority, (3) a certified check made payable to the authority, or (4) a bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the authority. Upon an award, the security of each unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the authority beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(e) When the design of portions of the project permits the selection of subcontractors, the contractor shall competitively bid those portions. The contractor shall provide to the authority a list of subcontractors whose work is in excess of one-half of 1 percent of the total project cost as soon as the subcontractors are identified. Once
 listed, the subcontractors shall have the rights provided in the Subletting and Subcontracting Fair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 414, Sec. 1.   (AB 811)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

130244.

(a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(1) “Authority” means the Orange County Transportation Authority.

(2) “Bonds” means bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness authorized to be issued pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (c).

(3) “Commission” means the Riverside County Transportation Commission.

(4) “Department” means the Department of Transportation.

(5) “Franchise agreement” means the franchise agreement assigned to the authority pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 130240.

(6) “Transportation facilities” means one or more of the following on State Highway Route 91 between the Orange and Riverside County line to the west and State Highway Route 15 to the east: (A) general purpose toll lanes; (B) lanes or facilities where the tolls may be levied and may vary according to levels of congestion anticipated or experienced or according to the occupancy of the vehicle; and (C) facilities or lanes utilizing combinations of or variations on (A) or (B), or other strategies the commission may determine appropriate on a facility-by-facility basis.

(7) “Transportation project” means the planning, design, development, financing, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, improvement, acquisition, lease, operation, or maintenance, or any combination of these, with respect to tolled and nontolled facilities, structures, onramps, connector roads, bridges, and roadways that are on, necessary for, or related to the construction or operation of State Highway Route 91 between the Orange and Riverside County line to the west and State Highway Route 15 to the east.

(b) Pursuant to subdivision (l) of Section 130240, the authority may amend, assign, or terminate the Riverside County portion of the franchise agreement in the interest of advancing the transportation project described in paragraph (7) of subdivision (a). The department, upon request of the authority, shall approve an amendment to the franchise agreement to eliminate any portion of State Highway Route 91 within Riverside County from the franchise agreement.

(c) (1) The commission shall have the authority to set, levy, and collect tolls, user fees, or other similar charges payable for use of the transportation facilities, and any other incidental or related fees or charges, in amounts as required for the following expenditures relative to the transportation facilities as defined in paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) and for purposes of paragraph (2):

(A) Capital outlay, including the costs of design, construction, right-of-way acquisition, and utility adjustment.

(B) Operations and maintenance, including, but not limited to, toll collection and enforcement.

(C) Repair and rehabilitation.

(D) Indebtedness incurred, including related financing costs.

(E) Reserves.

(F) Administration, which shall not exceed 3 percent of toll revenues and associated facility revenues.

(2) Excess toll revenues beyond the expenditure needs of paragraph (1) may be expended for the following purposes:

(A) To enhance transit service designed to reduce traffic congestion on State Highway Route 91 or to expand travel options along the State Highway Route 91 corridor. Revenues expended under this subparagraph may be used to maintain the enhanced transit service. Eligible expenditures include, but are not limited to, transit operating assistance, the acquisition of transit vehicles, improvements to commuter rail traveling between Riverside and Orange Counties, and those transit capital improvements otherwise eligible to be funded under the State Transportation Improvement Program pursuant to Section 164 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(B) To make operational or capacity improvements designed to reduce congestion or improve the flow of traffic on State Highway Route 91. Eligible expenditures may include any phase of project delivery to make capital improvements to onramps, connector roads, roadways, bridges, or other structures that are related to the tolled and nontolled facilities on State Highway Route 91 between the Orange and Riverside county line to the west and State Highway Route 15 to the east.

(3) The commission, in consultation with the authority and the department, shall issue a plan of transportation improvements for the State Highway Route 91 corridor, which shall include projected costs, the use of toll revenues, and a proposed completion schedule. This plan shall be updated annually. The plan and each annual update shall be made available for public review and comment no less than 30 days prior to adoption by the commission.

(4) The commission is authorized to issue bonds to finance the costs of the transportation project, including the costs of issuing the bonds and paying credit enhancement and other fees related to the bonds, which bonds are payable from the tolls authorized pursuant to paragraph (1), sales tax revenues, development impact fees, federal grant funds, or any other source of revenues available to the commission that may be used for these purposes. The bonds may be sold pursuant to the terms and conditions set forth in a resolution adopted by the governing board of the commission. Bonds shall be issued pursuant to a resolution adopted by a two-thirds vote of the commission. Any bond issued pursuant to this paragraph shall contain on its face a statement to the following effect: